Tennessee, session 114, HB0243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (18).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Department of mental health and substance abuse services, created by §§ 4-
3-101 and 4-3-1601;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0243
000323
- 1 -